Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1905
Assistant inspector; plumbing board members; compensation; meetings, restriction.

The assistant inspectors shall receive a salary in an amount to be determined by the city council or village board of trustees. The members of the plumbing board, not ex officio members, shall be paid an amount to be determined by the city council or village board of trustees. No meeting of the plumbing board shall be held at any time, except on the call of the chairperson of such board. All salaries shall be paid out of the general fund of the city or village, where the plumbing board is located, the same as other city or village officers are paid. Vouchers for the same shall be duly certified by the chairperson and secretary of such plumbing board to the city council, city manager, or village board of trustees.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 13, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 5278;

C.S.1922, § 4501;

C.S.1929, § 19-305;

R.S.1943, § 19-305;

Laws 1955, c. 54, § 2, p. 176;

Laws 1961, c. 57, § 5, p. 212;

Laws 1973, LB 103, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 123.